District of Columbia statutes.
29-608.06

Partner’s liability to other partners after dissolution.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section and § 29-603.06, after dissolution, a partner shall be liable to the other partners for the partner’s share of any partnership liability incurred under § 29-608.04.

(b)

A partner that, with knowledge of the dissolution, incurs a partnership liability under § 29-608.04(2) by an act that is not appropriate for winding up the partnership activities and affairs shall be liable to the partnership for any damage caused to the partnership arising from the liability.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(f)(8)(G), 59 DCR 13171
This section is referenced in § 29-608.09 and § 29-608.11.
1981 Ed., § 41-158.6.
2001 Ed., § 33-108.06.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “activities and affairs” for “business” in (b).

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 806 of the Uniform Partnership Act (1997 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.